Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-828
Behavioral Health Workforce Act; act, how cited.

Sections 71-828 to 71-830 shall be known and may be cited as the Behavioral Health Workforce Act.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 12.